Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 32
WATER AND SEWER DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 42-3201. Declaration of purpose.

It is hereby declared that the organization of water and sewer districts, having the purposes and powers provided in this act, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security and general welfare of the inhabitants of said districts.

§ 42-3202. Definition of terms.

A water district is one to supply water for domestic, commercial, and/or industrial purposes by any available means, and for that purpose any such district shall have power to extend its water lines to the source of water supply.

A sewer district is one to provide for sewage disposal and for that purpose any such district shall have power to extend its sewer lines to an appropriate outlet.

A district may be created for a combination of water and sewer purposes, or either of said purposes. A district may be entirely within or entirely without, or partly within and partly without one (1) or more municipalities or counties, and the district may consist of noncontiguous tracts or parcels of property.

The word “board” as used in this chapter shall mean the board of directors of a district.

A “qualified elector” of a district, within the meaning of and entitled to vote under this chapter, unless otherwise specifically provided herein, is a person qualified to vote at general elections in this state, and who has been a bona fide resident of the district for at least thirty (30) days prior to any election in the district.

Wherever the term “publication” is used in this chapter and no manner specified therefor, it shall mean publication twice, the first time not less than twelve (12) days prior to the election and the second time not less than five (5) days prior to the election, as provided in section 34-1406, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3202A. Recreational water and/or sewer district — Definition.

A recreational water and/or sewer district is one in which less than a majority of the landowners or state lessees or federal permittees in the district sought to be created reside within the district and at least fifty percent (50%) of the land area of said district is in a natural state, or used for agricultural purposes.

The actual or potential development anticipated for said district shall be predominantly recreational in character. The district or areas near the district shall meet one (1) or more of the following criteria: have unique scenic value; man-made or natural recreational facilities such as waterways, marinas, ski slopes, wilderness areas; provide open space; and be removed from large, densely populated urban areas. Recreational water and/or sewer districts shall provide services and/or facilities to landowners or state lessees or federal permittees. The proposed district shall be in the best interests of the state of Idaho in that the benefits derived by property owners shall effectuate the preservation and development of recreational opportunities within the state.

An annexation shall not change the status of a recreational water and/or sewer district.

§ 42-3202B. Water and/or sewer districts meeting the criteria of recreational water and/or sewer districts — Creation.

Each petition filed with the clerk of the district court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be verified and the petitioner shall certify or prove to the satisfaction of the court that the district sought to be created is a recreational water and/or sewer district under the terms of section 42-3202A, Idaho Code. The court decree pursuant to the provision of section 42-3207, Idaho Code, determining the nature of such district pursuant to the petitioner’s prayer shall be conclusive for this and all other purposes. If the water and/or sewer district sought to be created is a recreational water and/or sewer district as defined in section 42-3202A, Idaho Code, such recreational water or sewer district shall be created in the manner provided in chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, except that the term, “qualified elector” shall mean any natural person who is qualified to vote in an Idaho general election, and who is an actual resident of the district, or who is an actual resident of Idaho, owning land within the boundaries of the district or area to be included within the district, or is a lease holder of a state recreational lease, or is a permit holder of a federal recreational use permit and pays personal property tax on improvements on the lease or permit area, irrespective of his or her place of residence in Idaho. The holder or holders of a bona fide contract to purchase any land within the proposed district whose names appear upon the next preceding county assessment roll for the payment of taxes on the land shall be deemed an owner of land for the purposes of this section.

§ 42-3202C. Changing status of district.

The board of directors of a water and/or sewer district may, at any time after the formation of such district, determine that the district qualifies as a recreational water and/or sewer district as defined under section 42-3202A, Idaho Code, and that it is in the best interest of the district to petition the court to change the district’s status to a recreational water and/or sewer district. Said petition must be filed in the office of the clerk of the court vested with jurisdiction, in a county in which the major part of the real property in the existing district is situated. The petition must be signed by the chairman of the district’s board of directors and shall set forth the following:

The name of the existing district, date on which said district was formed and a general description of the district’s boundaries.

That the petition was initiated after a majority vote of the board of directors that it is in the best interest of the district to change its status to a recreational water and/or sewer district.

The criteria the district meets under section 42-3202A, Idaho Code, thereby qualifying it as a recreational water and/or sewer district.

A prayer for changing the status of the existing district to that of a recreational water and/or sewer district.

Upon filing of the petition, the court shall by order fix a time and place for hearing as provided in section 42-3206, Idaho Code. Upon the hearing of said petition any interested persons or corporations may appear before said court and make objections to the proposed status change. Further, if it then shall appear that the petition for a change in status has been signed and presented as hereinabove provided and the allegations of the petition are true, the court shall by order duly entered of record, grant the prayed for change of status of the existing district.

§ 42-3203. Jurisdiction to establish districts.

The district court sitting in and for any county in this state, or any judge thereof in vacation, is hereby vested with jurisdiction, power and authority to establish districts which may be entirely within or partly within and partly without the judicial district in which said court is located.

§ 42-3204. Petition — Contents — Amendments.

The organization of a district shall be initiated by a petition filed in the office of the clerk of the court vested with jurisdiction, in a county in which the major part of the real property in the proposed district is situated. The petition shall be signed by not less than ten per cent (10%) of the taxpayers of the district, who pay a general tax on real property owned by him or her within the district; provided, however, that no single tract or parcel of property containing five (5) acres or more may be included in any district organized under this act without the consent of the owner or owners thereof.

The petition shall set forth:

The name of the proposed district consisting of a chosen name preceding the words, “water district” or “sewer district,” or “water and sewer district.”

A general description of the improvements to be constructed or installed within and for the district.

The estimated cost of the proposed improvements.

A general description of the boundaries of the district or the territory to be included therein, with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his property is within the district.

A prayer for the organization of the district.

No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared null and void on account of alleged defects, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory, or in any other particular. Similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition for the organization of the same district may be filed and shall together be regarded as one petition. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition filed, shall be considered by the court the same as though filed with the first petition placed on file.

§ 42-3205. Bond of petitioners.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on said petition a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the court, sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district be not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the court shall be satisfied that the bond first executed is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond within a time to be fixed, not less than ten (10) days distant, and upon failure of the petitioner to execute the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

§ 42-3206. Notice of hearing on petition — Jurisdiction.

Immediately after the filing of such petition, the court wherein such petition is filed or a judge thereof in vacation, shall by order fix a place and time, not less than twenty (20) days nor more than forty (40) days after the petition is filed, for hearing thereon and thereupon the clerk of said court shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition and of the time and place of hearing thereon; the clerk of said court shall also forthwith cause a copy of said notice to be mailed by U.S. registered mail to the board of county commissioners of each of the several counties and to the governing body of each municipality having territory within the proposed district.

The district court in and for the county in which the petition for the organization of a district has been filed, shall thereafter for all purposes of this act, except as hereinafter otherwise provided, maintain and have original and exclusive jurisdiction, coextensive with the boundaries of the district, and of the real property proposed to be included in said district or affected by said district without regard to the usual limits of its jurisdiction.

No judge of such court wherein such petition is filed shall be disqualified to perform any duty imposed by this act by reason of ownership of property within any proposed district.

§ 42-3207. Hearings on petitions — Election for organization and directors.

On the day fixed for such hearing or at any adjournment thereof the court shall ascertain from the tax rolls of the county or counties in which the district is located or into which it extends, the total number of taxpayers within the proposed district, who pay a general tax on real property owned by him or her within the district.

If the court finds that no petition has been signed and presented in conformity with this chapter, or that the material facts are not as set forth in the petition filed, it shall dismiss said proceedings and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in such proportion as it shall deem just and equitable. No appeal or writ of error shall lie from an order dismissing said proceedings; but nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition or petitions for similar improvements or for a similar district, and the right so to renew such proceedings is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

Any time after the filing of the petition for the organization of a district and before the day fixed for the hearing thereon, the owner or owners of any real property within the proposed district may file a petition with the court stating reasons why said property should not be included therein, why his land or any part thereof will not be benefited by the proposed district, or should not be embraced in said district and made liable to taxation therefor, and praying that said property be excluded therefrom. Such petition shall be duly verified and shall describe the property sought to be excluded. The court shall conduct a hearing on said petition and shall hear all objections to the inclusion in the district of any lands described in said petition. In case any owner of real estate included in said proposed district shall satisfy the court that his real estate, or any part thereof, has been wrongfully included therein or will not be benefited thereby then the court shall exclude such real estate as will not be benefited.

Upon said hearing, if it shall appear that a petition for the organization of a district has been signed and presented as hereinabove provided, in conformity with this chapter, and the allegations of the petition are true, the court shall, by order duly entered of record, direct that the question of the organization of the district shall be submitted to the qualified electors of the district.

Such election shall be held in conformity with the general election in this state, including chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, except that the court shall establish as many election precincts within such proposed district as are deemed necessary, and shall define the boundaries thereof, which precincts and boundaries may thereafter be changed by the county commissioners if the district is organized.

At any time after the filing of the petition herein referred to and before the day fixed for hearing, nominees for the board of directors of the district may be nominated by the filing of a petition designating the name or names of the nominee or nominees, signed by at least five (5) qualified electors of the district. If upon the hearing as herein provided the court shall order an election for the creation of the district, the court shall also ascertain the names of persons nominated by the board of directors, and shall order that the names of persons whom the court finds to have been properly nominated shall be listed upon a ballot submitted to the electors at such election. In the event the court makes its order providing for such election, it shall prescribe the form of the question and ballot relating to the creation of the district, and also the form of the ballot relating to the election of the directors; provided that all matters may be contained upon one (1) ballot to be submitted to the voters.
At such election the voters shall vote for or against the organization of the district, and for five (5) qualified electors, who shall constitute the board of directors of the district, if organized, one (1) director to act until the first biennial election, two (2) until the second, and two (2) until the third biennial election.

The judges of election shall certify the returns of the election to the district court having jurisdiction. If a majority of the votes cast at said election are in favor of the organization, the district court shall declare the district organized and give it a corporate name by which, in all proceedings, it shall thereafter be known, and designated the first board of directors elected, and thereupon the district shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Idaho and a body corporate with all the powers of a public or quasi-municipal corporation.

If an order be entered establishing the district, such order shall be deemed final and no appeal or writ of error shall lie therefrom, and the entry of such order shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the said district against all persons except the state of Idaho, in an action in the nature of a writ of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within thirty (30) days after said decree declaring such district organized as herein provided, and not otherwise. The organization of said district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action or proceeding except as herein expressly authorized.

§ 42-3208. Qualification of members of board.

Whenever a district has been declared duly organized, the members of the board shall qualify by filing with the clerk of court their oaths of office, and corporate surety bonds at the expense of the district in an amount not to exceed $1,000 each, the form thereof to be fixed and approved by the court, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as directors.

§ 42-3209. Organization of board — Accounts of treasurer — Compensation of members — Annual audit — Removal of directors.

After taking oath and filing bonds, the board shall choose one (1) of its members as chairman of the board and president of the district, and shall elect a secretary and a treasurer of the board and of the district, who may or may not be members of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one person. Such board shall adopt a seal and the secretary shall keep, in a well-bound book, a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by employees and all corporate acts which shall be open to inspection of all owners of real property in the district, as well as to all other interested parties.

The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district, in permanent records. He shall file with the clerk of the court, at the expense of the district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of his office.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his service a sum not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting, payable monthly. No member of the board shall receive any compensation as an employee of the district or otherwise, other than that herein provided, and no member of the board shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his official representative capacity.

It shall be the duty of the board of directors to cause an audit to be made of all financial affairs of the district during each year ending November 30th as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.

The court having jurisdiction of the district shall have the power to remove directors for cause shown, on petition, notice and hearing.

§ 42-3210. Meetings — Vacancies.

The board shall meet regularly once each month at a time and in a place to be designated by the board. Special meetings may be held as often as the needs of the district require, on notice to each member of the board. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum at any meeting. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the remaining members or member of the board, the appointee to act until the next biennial election when the vacancy shall be filled by election. If the board shall fail, neglect or refuse to fill any vacancy within thirty (30) days after the same occurs, the court having jurisdiction shall fill such vacancy. In the event the board has created director zones and is unable to appoint a board member from the zone vacated, the board may appoint a person-at-large who is an elector of the water and/or sewer district to serve as director of the zone where the vacancy occurred.

§ 42-3211. Elections — Terms of office.

On the third Tuesday in May, in the first odd-numbered year after the organization of any district, and on the third Tuesday in May every second year thereafter an election shall be held, which shall be known as the biennial election of the district. Such election shall be held and conducted consistent with the provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

In districts created under section 42-3202B, Idaho Code, biennial elections shall be held on the third Tuesday in May.

At the first biennial election in any district hereafter organized, and each sixth year thereafter, there shall be elected by the qualified electors of the district, one (1) member of the board to serve for a term of six (6) years; at the second biennial election and each sixth year thereafter, there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for terms of six (6) years, and at the third biennial election, and each sixth year thereafter, there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for terms of six (6) years.

In any election for director, if after the deadline for filing a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that the number of qualified candidates who have been nominated is equal to the number of directors to be elected, it shall not be necessary for the candidates to stand for election, and the board of directors shall declare such candidates elected as directors, and the secretary of the district shall immediately make and deliver to such persons certificates of election signed by him and bearing the seal of the district.

§ 42-3211a. Expiration of term.

Any person serving as a board member for a recreational water district, recreational sewer district or a recreational water and sewer district, whose term of office would, after the effective date of this act, expire in January shall continue to serve until the following July election, and all subsequently elected board members shall serve terms of office beginning and ending in July.

§ 42-3211b. Decision to establish board director zones.

Subsequent to the creation of a water and/or sewer district and the election of the first board of directors, the water and/or sewer district board of directors may elect, by resolution, to divide the district into five (5) director zones, as nearly equal in area and parcels to be served as practicable, to be known as zones one, two, three, four and five. If the board of directors elects to create director zones, then it shall also, prior to the next district election, adopt a director election transition schedule for each zone, in accordance with the terms of office of the existing directors, which provides that at the end of the last then-currently serving director term, there will not be more than one (1) director per director zone.

In the event the board of directors establishes director zones, each water and/or sewer district director shall be elected on a districtwide basis.

Director zones may be revised or modified by the board of directors as conditions governing their establishment change.

§ 42-3212. General powers of board.

For and on behalf of the district the board shall have the following powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions and proceedings;

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, to enter into contracts and agreements, cooperative and otherwise, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with the United States of America and any of its agencies or instrumentalities, and contracts with corporations, public or private, municipalities, or governmental subdivisions, and to cooperate with any one (1) or more of them in building, erecting or constructing works, canals, pipelines, sewage treatment plants, and other facilities within or without the district. Except in cases in which a district will receive aid from a governmental agency, procurement of goods or services shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by certificate, notes or debentures, and to issue bonds, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

To acquire, dispose of and encumber real and personal property, water, water rights, water and sewage systems and plants, and any interest therein, including leases and easements within or without said district;

To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district without an election; provided, however, that the obligations of the district shall not be increased by any refund of bonded indebtedness. Otherwise, the terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds;

To have the management, control and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district, and the construction, installation, operation and maintenance of district improvements therein or therefor;

To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers and attorneys;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers herein granted, both within and without the district;

To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities across or along any public street or highway, and in, upon, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are now, or may become, the property of the state of Idaho, and to construct works and establish and maintain facilities across any stream of water or watercourse, and to maintain access to facilities and works by the removal of snow from roads and lands; provided, however, that the district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as to completely or unnecessarily impair the usefulness thereof;

To fix and from time to time to increase or decrease water and sewer rates, tolls or charges for services or facilities furnished by the district, and to pledge such revenue for the payment of any indebtedness of the district. The board shall fix rates, tolls and charges and the time or times for the payment thereof. All such rates, tolls and charges not paid within thirty (30) days after the date fixed for the payment thereof shall become delinquent; the board shall certify all such delinquent rates, tolls and charges to the tax collector of the county by the district, not later than the first day of August and shall be, by said tax collector, placed upon the tax roll and collected in the same manner and subject to the same penalties as other district taxes; provided, however, that special assessments certified to the tax collector which are placed on property qualifying for a hardship exemption may be returned to the taxing district from which they originated if the special assessments are not paid within three (3) years. The date of priority of such lien shall be the date upon which such charge becomes delinquent. The board shall shut off or discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, tolls or charges, or in the payment of taxes levied pursuant to this chapter, and prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for the connection with and the disconnection from properties of the facilities of the district. For health and sanitary purposes the board shall have the power to compel the owners of inhabited property within a sewer district to connect their property with the sewer system of such district, and upon a failure so to connect within sixty (60) days after written notice by the board so to do the board may cause such connection to be made and a lien to be filed against the property for the expense incurred in making such connection, provided, however, that no owner shall be compelled to connect his property with such system unless a service line is brought, by the district, to a point within two hundred (200) feet of his dwelling place;

To adopt and amend bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects and affairs of the board and of the district;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

§ 42-3213. Taxes.

In addition to the other means providing revenue for such districts as herein provided, the board shall have power and authority to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the district.

§ 42-3214. Levy and collection of taxes.

To levy and collect taxes as herein provided, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district, and with other revenues will raise the amount required by the district annually, to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of construction, operating and maintaining the works and equipment of the district, and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on the principal of bonds and other obligations of the district, and in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 42-3215[, Idaho Code]. The board shall, on or before the first day of September of each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, or having a portion of its territory within the district, the rate so fixed with directions that at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes for county purposes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners at the rate so fixed and determined.

§ 42-3215. Levies to cover defaults and deficiencies.

The board in certifying annual levies as herein provided, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing bonds and interest on bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the district are not sufficient punctually to pay the annual instalments on its contracts or bonds, and interest thereon, and to pay defaults and deficiencies, then the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and notwithstanding any limitations, such taxes shall be made and continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the district shall be fully paid.

§ 42-3216. Officers to levy and collect taxes.

It shall be the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county, to levy the taxes provided in this act and it shall be the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection, and the payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district.

§ 42-3217. Sinking fund.

Whenever any indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it shall be lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a sinking fund in such amount sufficient to meet the payments of principal and interest on such indebtedness as the same matures, and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal amount of the indebtedness within thirty (30) years from the time of contracting the indebtedness evidenced thereby and in accordance with the provisions made for the payment of the principal and interest of such indebtedness and also to constitute a sinking fund for payment of the principal thereof, and theretofore provided by resolution pursuant to section 42-3222, Idaho Code, and as required by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho.